Utah statutes.
53C-2-407.   Mineral lease application procedures.
(1)  Lands that are not encumbered by a current mineral lease for the same
resource, a withdrawal order, or other rule of the director prohibiting the
lease of the lands, may be offered for lease as provided in this section or
may, with board approval, be committed to another contractual arrangement
under Subsection 53C-2-401(1)(d).
(2) (a)  A notice of the land available for leasing shall be posted in the
administration's office.
(b)  The notice shall:
(i)  describe the land;
(ii)  indicate what mineral interest in each tract is available for leasing;
and
(iii)  state the last date, which shall be no less than 15 days after the
notice is posted, on which bids may be received.
(3) (a)  Applications for the lease of lands filed before the closing date
stated in the notice shall be considered to be filed simultaneously.
(b)  The applications shall be:
(i)  submitted in sealed envelopes; and
(ii)  opened in the administration's office at 10:00 a.m.  of the first
business day following the last day on which bids may be received.
(c)  Leases shall be awarded to the highest responsible, qualified bidder, in
terms of the bonus paid in addition to the first year's rental, who submitted
a bid in the manner required.
(d)  In cases of identical bids of successful bidders:
(i)  the right to lease shall be determined by drawing or oral auction;
(ii)  the determination of whether to award the lease by drawing or oral
auction shall be made at the sole discretion of the director; and
(iii)  the drawing or oral auction shall be held in public at the
administration's office in a manner calculated to optimize the return to the
trust land beneficiary.
(4) (a)  At the discretion of the director, mineral leases may be offered at
an oral public auction.
(b)  The director may set a minimum bid for a public auction.
(5)  The director may award a mineral lease without following the competitive
bidding procedures specified in Subsections (3) and (4) or conducting an oral
public auction, if the mineral lessee waives or relinquishes to the trust a
prior mining claim, mineral lease, or other right which in the opinion of the
director might otherwise:
(a)  defeat or encumber the selection of newly acquired land, either for
indemnity or other purposes, or the acquisition by the trust of any land; or
(b)  cloud the title to any of those lands.
(6)  Following the awarding of a lease to a successful bidder, deposits,
except filing fees, made by unsuccessful bidders shall be returned to those
bidders.
(7) (a)  Lands acquired through exchange or indemnity selection from the
federal government shall be subject to the vested rights of unpatented mining
claimants under the Mining Law of 1872, as amended, and other federal vested
rights, both surface and minerals.
(b)  Subsection (7)(a) does not prevent the director from negotiating the
accommodation of vested rights through any method acceptable to the parties.
(8)  The director may lease lands in the order in which applications are filed
if:
(a)  the director offers trust lands for lease for mineral purposes according
to the procedures in Subsections (3) through (6) and the lands are not leased;
or
(b)  a period of time of not less than one year but less than three years has
elapsed following:
(i)  a revocation of a withdrawal; or
(ii)  the date an existing mineral lease is canceled, relinquished,
surrendered, or terminated.
